hr-HR: Materijal jezičaka bas usne harmonike: Mjed; Fosforna bronca; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
zh-CN: 低音口琴簧片材质: 黄铜; 磷青铜; 不锈钢; 其他
vi: Chất liệu lưỡi kèn harmonica bass: Đồng thau; Đồng phosphor; Thép không gỉ; Khác
pt-BR: Material de palheta para gaita de boca: Latão; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Outros
zh-TW: 低音口琴簧片材質: 黃銅; 磷青銅; 不鏽鋼; 其他
es: Material de lengüetas para la armónica de bajo: Latón; Bronce fosforoso; Acero inoxidable; Otro
pt-PT: Material de palheta para harmónica baixo: Latão; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Outro
pl: Materiał stroików harmonijki basowej: Mosiądz; Brąz fosforowy; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
lt-LT: Bosinės armonikėlės liežuvėlių medžiaga: Žalvaris; Fosforo bronza; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
ko: 베이스 하모니카 리드 재질: 황동; 인청동; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
ro-RO: Materialul anciei muzicuței bas: Alamă; Bronz fosforos; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
th: วัสดุลิ้นเสียงฮาร์โมนิกาเบส: ทองเหลือง; ฟอสเฟอร์บรอนซ์; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
fi: Bassohuuliharpun kielten materiaali: Messinki; Fosforipronssi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
cs: Materiál jazýčků basové harmoniky: Mosaz; Fosforový bronz; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
sk-SK: Materiál jazýčkov pre basovú harmoniku: Mosadz; Fosforový bronz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
bg-BG: Материал на езичетата на бас хармониката: Месинг; Фосфорен бронз; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
nb: Bassmunnspill rørbladmateriale: Messing; Fosforbronse; Rustfritt stål; Annet
sv: Tungornas material för munspel: Mässing; Fosforbrons; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
nl: Basharmonica tongmateriaal: Messing; Fosforbrons; Roestvrij staal; Overig
da: Materiale i stemmerne på basmundharmonikaen: Messing; Fosforbronze; Rustfrit stål; Andet
ja: ベースハーモニカのリード素材: 真鍮; リン青銅; ステンレス鋼; その他
en: Bass harmonica reed material: Brass; Phosphor bronze; Stainless steel; Other
fr: Matériau des anches de l’harmonica basse: Laiton; Bronze phosphoreux; Acier inoxydable; Autre
it: materiale per ance per armonica a bocca basso: Ottone; Bronzo fosforoso; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
tr: Bas armonika dil malzemesi: Pirinç; Fosfor bronz; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
de: Material der Bassmundharmonika-Blätter: Messing; Phosphorbronze; Edelstahl; Sonstige
ru: Материал язычков бас-гармоники: Латунь; Фосфористая бронза; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
sl-SI: Material za piskovno ploščico basovskih orglic: Medenina; Fosforjev bron; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
el: Υλικό καλαμιού φυσαρμόνικας μπάσου: Ορείχαλκος; Φωσφορούχος ορείχαλκος; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
hu: Basszusharmonika-nád anyaga: Sárgaréz; Foszforbronz; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb